Idaho, session 2025, H0431.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 67-6607, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-6607. REPORTS OF CONTRIBUTIONS AND EXPENDITURES BY CANDIDATES AND
POLITICAL COMMITTEES. (1) Each candidate or the political treasurer for each
candidate, and each political committee or the political treasurer of each
political committee, shall file with the secretary of state a statement of
all contributions received, including any compensation from the federal
government that was received by the candidate for employment or services
rendered, and all expenditures and encumbrances made by or on behalf of the
candidate or political committee, according to the schedule provided in
this section. The statement shall itemize each contribution received and
each expenditure or encumbrance made during the reporting period and shall
include the following:
(a) Under contributions, the statement shall include a list of all the
contributions received, including any funds or property of the candi-
date used to cover expenditures. The statement shall list the full name
and complete address of each person who contributed an aggregate amount
of more than fifty dollars ($50.00) and the amount contributed by that
person. The statement may list as a single item the total amount of con-
tributions of fifty dollars ($50.00) or less; and
(b) Under expenditures, the statement shall include the name and ad-
dress of each person to whom an expenditure or encumbrance was made in
the amount of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) or more, and the amount,
date, and purpose of each such expenditure. Each expenditure or encum-
brance in the amount of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) or more shall be
evidenced by an invoice, receipt, or canceled check or an accurate copy
thereof. Such evidence shall not be filed with the statement but shall
be retained by the committee or candidate for a period of one (1) year
after the statement has been filed. The statement may list as a single
item the total amount of expenditures and encumbrances of less than
twenty-five dollars ($25.00) without showing the exact amount of or re-
quiring evidence of each such expenditure or encumbrance. Anything of
value, other than money, paid for or contributed by any person shall be
listed both as an expenditure and as a contribution.
(2) For the first report under this section, the reporting period shall
cover the period beginning with the first contribution, expenditure, or en-


cumbrance through the end of the current reporting period. Each candidate
and each political committee, or the treasurer for a candidate or political
committee or ballot measure, shall file the report described under subsec-
tion (1) of this section as follows:
(a) In the year of the election, a monthly report shall be filed for each
month of the year. Each report shall be filed by the tenth day of the
month following the month being reported; and
(b) For the nonelection year, an annual report covering the nonelection
year shall be filed by January 10 of the following year.
(3) Notwithstanding any other reports required under this section,
each candidate and each political committee, or the political treasurer for
each candidate and each political committee, shall notify the secretary of
state of any contribution of one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more. This
notification shall be made within forty-eight (48) hours after the receipt
of such contribution and shall include the name of the candidate, political
committee or measure, the identification of the contributor, and the date of
receipt and amount of the contribution. The notification shall be in addi-
tion to the reporting of these contributions in the regular reports.
(4) All reports required pursuant to this section shall be filed online
with the secretary of state, unless a waiver has been provided under section
67-6623, Idaho Code, by no later than midnight on the date the filing is due.
(5) Reports required to be filed under the provisions of this section
shall be filed until the account no longer shows any unexpended balance of
contributions or expenditure deficit.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.